Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB469.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 214 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect Kentucky adults and children
from the adverse effects of experimental gene therapy and biologic products
utilized as immunizations. The General Assembly seeks to establish a moratorium
on gene therapy immunizations to ensure the safety and well-being of all
Kentuckians.
(2) As used in this section, "human gene therapy product":
(a) Means all products that mediate their effects by transcription or translation
of transferred genetic material or by specifically altering human genetic
sequences; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to:
1. Nucleic acids, such as plasmids and in vitro transcribed ribonucleic
acid (RNA);
2. Genetically modified microorganisms, such as viruses, bacteria, and
fungi;
3. Engineered site-specific nucleases used for human genome editing;
and
4. Ex vivo genetically modified human cells.
(3) A person in the Commonwealth shall not administer, by any route or modality,
any human gene therapy product for any infectious disease indication, regardless
of whether the administration is termed an immunization, vaccine, or any other
term.
(4) The provisions of this section:
(a) Shall not apply to human gene therapy products utilized for treatment or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 9:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1582
therapy of cancer or genetic disorders; and
(b) Shall expire on July 1, 2035, unless extended by an act of the General
Assembly following legislative review of available safety data.
Section 2. Whereas it is essential that the General Assembly promptly provide
for safety in public health settings in the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 9:56 AM Jacketed